Louisiana, session 2026, SB493.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:32(C)(1)(a) and (2)(a) are hereby amended to read as follows:
§32 Duty to permit examination; prevention of alteration; payment for overtime;
copies provided; fees
* * *
C.(1)(a) For all public records, except public records of state agencies, it shall
be the duty of the custodian of the public records to provide copies to persons so
requesting, unless the requestor fails to pay the applicable copying fees after being
notified of the amount in advance of production or the requestor has an outstanding
balance from a prior request. The custodian may establish and collect reasonable fees
for making copies of public records, which may include the transmission of
electronic copies of public records. However, the maximum rates a custodian may
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-488 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 493
charge for records are as follows: the first twenty pages of records shall be
provided free of charge. Thereafter, a maximum rate of five cents per page may
be collected for paper copies. Custodians may charge the requestor for postage
to mail paper copies. Custodians must provide requestors with the option to
receive responsive records electronically. The rate for electronic records shall
not exceed ten dollars.
Any custodian who elects to establish and collect fees shall establish a
reasonable fee schedule and post the schedule where it can be readily accessed by the
public. The fee schedule shall also be posted to the agency's website. The
custodian may request payment of fees in advance of production. Copies of records
may be furnished without charge or at a reduced charge to indigent citizens of this
state or to nonprofit organizations. Custodians are prohibited from charging for
staff time to respond to a public records request.
* * *
(2)(a) For all public records of state agencies, it shall be the duty of the
custodian of such records to provide copies to persons so requesting, unless the
requestor fails to pay the applicable copying fees after being notified of the amount
in advance of production or the requestor has an outstanding balance from a prior
request. Fees for such copies shall be charged according to the uniform fee schedule
adopted by the commissioner of administration as provided by R.S. 39:241 or as
otherwise fixed or provided by law. However, the fees shall not exceed those
specified in Subparagraph (C)(1)(a) of this Section. Copies of records may be
furnished without charge or at a reduced charge to indigent citizens of this state or
the persons whose use of such copies, as determined by the custodian, will be limited
to a public purpose, including but not limited to use in a hearing before any
governmental regulatory commission.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-488 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 493